New York, session 2025-2026, A11084.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public housing law is amended by adding a new section 2 62 to read as follows: 3 § 62. Resident councils; transparency. 1. For the purposes of this 4 section, the term "resident council" shall include any tenant associ- 5 ations, resident associations, or tenant councils. 6 2. Every resident council shall maintain a website and shall post on 7 such website such resident council's budgets and spending of tenant 8 participation activity funds. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13487-01-5